Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.027

Annual financial report.

The governor, through the director, shall prepare and publish within six months of the end of the fiscal year, as a matter of public record, an annual financial report that encompasses all funds and account groups of the state.

[ 1984 c 247 s 2.]